tools/nvda/louis/tables/de-g2-core.cti
#  liblouis: German Grade 2 Braille
#
#  Copyright (C) 2018 SBS Schweizerische Bibliothek für Blinde, Seh- und Lesebehinderte
#  Copyright (C) 2022 Bert Frees
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-------------------------------------------------------------------------------


letsign 6

noletsignbefore '
noletsignafter .'

noletsign cCqQxXyY\x250A
noletsign ÀàÁáÂâÃãÅåÆæÇçÈèÉéÊê
noletsign ËëÌìÍíÎîÏïÐðÑñÒòÓóÔô
noletsign ÕõØøÙùÚúÛûÝýÞþßŸÿŒœĀā
noletsign ĂăĄąĆćĈĉĊċČčĎďĐđĒēĖė
noletsign ĘęĚěĞğĢģĤĥĦħĨĩĪīĮįİı
noletsign ĲĳĴĵĶķĹĺĻļĽľĿŀŁłŃńŅņ
noletsign ŇňŊŋŌōŎŏŐőŔŕŖŗŘřŚśŜŝ
noletsign ŞşŠšŢţŤťŦŧŨũŪūŬŭŮůŰű
noletsign ŲųŴŵŶŷŹźŻżŽžǍǎȘșȚțẀẁ
noletsign ẂẃẄẅỲỳ

# endword vor Wortersatzstrich und Satzzeichen verhindern (vor Satzzeichen Pt.6)
noback correct "-!\s" "\x250A-'\x250A!\s"
noback correct "-?\s" "\x250A-'\x250A?\s"
noback correct "-)\s" "\x250A-]\s"
noback correct "-«\s" "\x250A-‹\s"

# fehlender Pt.6 (Apo) bei Wort-Zahl-Ausdrücken
noback correct $l[]$d "\x256C"

# fehlender Pt.6 (Apo) bei Ausrufe-/Fragezeichen in Klammern
always (!)       2356-6-235-2356
always (?)       2356-6-26-2356

# fehlender Pt.6 (Apo) bei alleinstehendem Ausrufe- oder Fragezeichen in Klammern
always \s(?      0-2356-6-26
always \s[?      0-6-2356-6-26
always \s(!      0-2356-6-235
always \s[!      0-6-2356-6-235

# The letsign opcode makes sure that single letters that are also a
# contraction are indicated with dot 6. However if these single
# letters are followed by a single quote this mechanism doesn't work.
# But dot 6 is also needed in that situation
word	a'	6-1-6
word	b'	6-12-6
word	d'	6-145-6
word	e'	6-15-6
word	f'	6-124-6
word	g'	6-1245-6
word	i'	6-24-6
word	j'	6-245-6
word	k'	6-13-6
word	l'	6-123-6
word	m'	6-134-6
word	n'	6-1345-6
word	o'	6-135-6
word	p'	6-1234-6
word	r'	6-1235-6
word	t'	6-2345-6
word	u'	6-136-6
word	v'	6-1236-6
word	w'	6-2456-6
word	z'	6-1356-6

include de-g2-core-patterns.dic

# Attach virtual dot "a" and letter attribute to contraction
# patterns. Private use area U+F800 - U+F83F is used to represent
# these.

letter  \xF804  3a             # . #
letter  \xF806  23a            # ; #
letter  \xF80C  34a            # \ #
letter  \xF812  25a            # : #
letter  \xF814  35a            # * #
letter  \xF816  235a           # + #
letter  \xF818  45a            # > #
letter  \xF81C  345a           # @ #
letter  \xF821  16a            # 1 #
letter  \xF822  26a            # ? #
letter  \xF823  126a           # 2 #
letter  \xF824  36b            # - #
letter  \xF826  236a           # ( #
letter  \xF828  46a            # $ #
letter  \xF829  146a           # 3 #
letter  \xF82A  246a           # 9 #
letter  \xF82B  1246a          # 6 #
letter  \xF82C  346a           # 0 #
letter  \xF82E  2346a          # ^ #
letter  \xF82F  12346a         # & #
letter  \xF830  56a            # < #
letter  \xF831  156a           # 5 #
letter  \xF832  256a           # / #
letter  \xF833  1256a          # 8 #
letter  \xF834  356a           # ) #
letter  \xF836  2356a          # = #
letter  \xF837  12356a         # [ #
letter  \xF838  456a           # _ #
letter  \xF839  1456a          # 4 #
letter  \xF83B  12456a         # 7 #
letter  \xF83C  3456a          # # #
letter  \xF83E  23456a         # ] #
letter  \xF83F  123456a        # % #

noback pass2 @3a @3
noback pass2 @23a @23
noback pass2 @34a @34
noback pass2 @25a @25
noback pass2 @35a @35
noback pass2 @235a @235
noback pass2 @45a @45
noback pass2 @345a @345
noback pass2 @16a @16
noback pass2 @26a @26
noback pass2 @126a @126
noback pass2 @36b @36a
noback pass2 @236a @236
noback pass2 @46a @46
noback pass2 @146a @146
noback pass2 @246a @246
noback pass2 @1246a @1246
noback pass2 @346a @346
noback pass2 @2346a @2346
noback pass2 @12346a @12346
noback pass2 @56a @56
noback pass2 @156a @156
noback pass2 @256a @256
noback pass2 @1256a @1256
noback pass2 @356a @356
noback pass2 @2356a @2356
noback pass2 @12356a @12356
noback pass2 @456a @456
noback pass2 @1456a @1456
noback pass2 @12456a @12456
noback pass2 @3456a @3456
noback pass2 @23456a @23456
noback pass2 @123456a @123456
